Utah statutes.
16-6a-1417.   Decree of dissolution.

(1)  If after a hearing the court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in Section 16-6a-1414 exist:

(a)  the court may enter a decree:

(i)  dissolving the nonprofit corporation; and

(ii)  specifying the effective date of the dissolution; and

(b)  the clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the division which shall file it accordingly.

(2)  After entering the decree of dissolution, the court shall direct:

(a)  the winding up and liquidation of the nonprofit corporation's affairs in accordance with Section 16-6a-1405; and

(b)  the giving of notice to:

(i) (A)  the nonprofit corporation's registered agent; or

(B)  the division if it has no registered agent; and

(ii)  to claimants in accordance with Sections 16-6a-1406 and 16-6a-1407.

(3)  The court's order or decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

